Washington statutes.
RCW 35.31.020

Charter cities—Manner of filing.

The provisions of chapter 35.31 RCW shall be applied notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in any charter of any city permitted by law to have a charter; however, charter provisions not inconsistent herewith shall continue to apply. All claims for damages against a charter city shall be filed in the manner set forth in chapter 4.96 RCW.

[ 1993 c 449 s 7; 1967 c 164 s 12; 1965 c 7 s 35.31.020. Prior: 1957 c 224 s 3; 1917 c 96 s 1; 1915 c 148 s 1; 1909 c 83 s 2; RRS s 9479.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Severability—1993 c 449: See notes following RCW 4.96.010.

Purpose—Severability—1967 c 164: See notes following RCW 4.96.010.

Tortious conduct of political subdivisions and municipal corporations, liability for damages: Chapter 4.96 RCW.